Wyoming statutes. Title 23 Game and Fish
Article 3. Wildlife Provisions

Joint resolution. —

Laws 2002, Sp. Sess., Senate Joint Resolution No. 3, §§ 1 to 4, requests Congress to direct all federal authorities responsible for wolf reintroduction in the state to manage wolves so that the elk, moose and deer population, moose and deer habitats and elk feeding grounds are preserved and to annually reimburse the state for the loss of elk, moose and deer to wolves.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity, construction, and application of state wildlife possession laws, 50 ALR5th 703.

§ 23-3-301.
Importation and sale of wildlife prohibited; exceptions.

No person shall import into Wyoming from any source any living antelope, bear, deer, elk, moose, mountain goat, mountain lion, bighorn sheep, wolf, wolf hybrid nor any living wildlife except as otherwise permitted by this act.

No person shall sell any living antelope, bear, deer, elk, moose, mountain goat, mountain lion, bighorn sheep, wolf, wolf hybrid or falcon except as permitted by the commission.

No person shall knowingly import into Wyoming or knowingly possess from any source any wildlife or wildlife parts taken illegally in any other state or country.

Violation of this section constitutes a high misdemeanor punishable as provided in W.S. 23-6-202(a)(ii).

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 249, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 23.1-75; 2003, ch. 115, § 2; 2013 ch. 78, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, added (c) and (d).

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to at the end of subsection (a), see § 23-1-102(a)(xiii).

Import ban discriminates against interstate commerce on its face

and, therefore, defendants bear the burden of showing that the ban is not unconstitutional. Dorrance v. McCarthy, 957 F.2d 761, 1992 U.S. App. LEXIS 2129 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1992).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Reserving Wildlife for Resident Consumption: Is the Dormant Commerce Clause the Outfitters' White Knight?,” see XXXII Land & Water L. Rev. 125 (1997).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity, construction, and application of state wildlife possession laws, 50 ALR5th 703.

§ 23-3-302.
Sale, disposition or acquisition of edible portion of game animals, game birds or game fish.

No person shall sell, barter, or dispose of for pecuniary consideration or advantage, or obtain by sale or barter any edible portion of any game animal, game bird or game fish in this state except as permitted by this act.

History.

Laws 1939, ch. 65, § 74; C.S. 1945, § 47-510; Laws 1949, ch. 89, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 23-92; Laws 1967, ch. 8, § 1; 1973, ch. 249, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 23.1-76.

Cross references. —

As to sale of game birds on licensed game bird farm, see §§

23-5-101

through

23-5-110

.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see
§

23-1-102

(a)(xiii).

§ 23-3-303.
Waste of edible portion of game bird, fish or animal, except trophy game animal, prohibited; abandonment of meat at meat processing plant.

No person shall take and leave, abandon or allow any game bird, game fish, or game animal except trophy game animal, or edible portion, to intentionally or needlessly go to waste. No person shall knowingly possess any parts of a big game animal wasted as provided in this subsection.

The failure of any person to properly dress and care for any big game animal killed by that person, and, if the carcass is reasonably accessible, within forty-eight (48) hours to take or transport the carcass to the camp of that person, and there properly care for the carcass, is prima facie evidence of a violation of subsection (a).

No person shall abandon meat from a big game animal or game bird at a meat processing plant. Unless there is an express agreement between the processing plant and the person providing otherwise, any person leaving meat from a big game animal or game bird at a meat processing plant for more than forty-five (45) days is prima facie evidence of a violation of this subsection if written notice of the expiration of time has been attempted by the processing plant in accordance with rules and regulations promulgated by the game and fish department. The owner or operator in charge of any meat processing plant shall immediately report a violation of this subsection to any enforcement personnel of the department. Notwithstanding any other provision of this act, the owner of the meat processing plant is entitled to the proceeds of sale of any meat confiscated under this subsection up to the amount of reasonable processing or storage charges following a conviction under this subsection or a reasonable time after the violation is reported. If the department has been unsuccessful in selling the confiscated meat within thirty (30) days following the reported violation, the department may dispose of the meat as it deems appropriate.

History.

Laws 1929, ch. 93, § 33; R.S. 1931, § 49-207; Laws 1933, ch. 39, § 18; C.S. 1945, § 47-512; W.S. 1957, § 23-94; Laws 1973, ch. 249, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 23.1-77; 1996, ch. 109, § 1; 2013 ch. 78, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, added the last sentence in (a).

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in the fourth sentence in subsection (c), see § 23-1-102(a)(xiii).

“Person.” —

Outfitter was a “person” within meaning of this section, since “person” includes a corporation, company, or other type of association. Billings v. Wyoming State Bd. of Outfitters & Professional Guides, 837 P.2d 84,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 124

(Wyo. 1992).

To violate subsection (a) of this section,

the same “person” who took the animal must also allow it to go to waste. Billings v. Wyoming State Bd. of Outfitters & Professional Guides, 837 P.2d 84,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 124

(Wyo. 1992).

Cited

in

Mayland v. State, 568 P.2d 897,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 283

(Wyo. 1977).

§ 23-3-304.
Certain trapping devices unlawful; game for bait prohibited; baiting big game animals prohibited; penalties.

No person shall take or wound any game animal, game bird, or game fish by use of any pit, pitfall, net, trap, deadfall, poison, or other similar device except as otherwise provided. From and after the date gray wolves are removed from the list of experimental nonessential population, endangered species or threatened species in Wyoming as provided by W.S.

23-1-108

, gray wolves may be taken with a trap or snare only as allowed by and in accordance with rules and regulations of the commission.

No person shall take a game animal, game bird, or game fish, and use any parts thereof, for bait to trap or poison any wildlife of Wyoming.

Violation of this section constitutes a high misdemeanor punishable as provided in W.S. 23-6-202(a)(ii).

No person shall place any bait for the purpose of taking a big game animal nor shall any person knowingly take a big game animal by the use of any bait that has been deposited, placed, distributed or scattered in a manner to constitute a lure, attraction or enticement to, on or over the area where any hunter is taking big game animals. Nothing in this subsection shall:

Apply to normal or accepted agricultural management practices;

Prohibit taking big game animals over stored and standing crops, salt, mineral or other feed scattered solely as a result of normal and accepted agricultural practices;

Apply to the placement, distribution, depositing or scattering of bait, as approved by the game and fish commission, for the taking of big game animals by any legally blind person, person confined to a wheelchair or person hunting with a license issued pursuant to W.S. 23-1-705(j);

Apply to the placement, distribution, depositing or scattering of bait for the taking of big game animals in hunt areas to address population management, damage, disease or human safety issues. The commission shall promulgate rules and regulations governing the provisions of this paragraph.

As used in subsection (d) of this section, “bait” means the direct or indirect placing, exposing, depositing, distributing or scattering of salt, hay, grain, fruit, nuts or chemical, mineral or other feed as an attraction or enticement for big game animals, regardless of the kind and quantity. A chemical used as an attractant or mask rather than for consumption shall not be considered “bait”.

Repealed by Laws 2007, ch. 62 § 2.

History.

Laws 1921, ch. 83, § 61; 1929, ch. 93, § 19; R.S. 1931, § 49-164; C.S. 1945, § 47-520; W.S. 1957, § 23-99; Laws 1967, ch. 168, § 1; 1973, ch. 249, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 23.1-78; Laws 2001, ch. 27, § 1; 2003, ch. 115, § 2; 2005, ch. 7, § 1; 2007, ch. 62, §§ 1, 2; 2012, ch. 54, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, in (d)(iii), added “or person hunting with a license issued pursuant to W.S. 23-1-705(j),” and made stylistic changes.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, in (c), deleted “subsections (a) and (b) of” following “Violation of,” substituted “high misdemeanor punishable as provided in W.S. 23-6-202(a)(ii)” for “3rd degree misdemeanor”; and repealed (f), which read: “A violation of subsection (d) of the section constitutes a 5th degree misdemeanor.”

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, added (d)(iv).

§ 23-3-305.
Hunting from highway; entering enclosed property without permission; penalty; hunting at night without permission prohibited.

No person shall hunt, shoot, or attempt to kill any wildlife from any public road or highway.

No person shall enter upon the private property of any person to hunt, fish, collect antlers or horns, or trap without the permission of the owner or person in charge of the property. Violation of this subsection constitutes a low misdemeanor punishable as provided in W.S. 23-6-202(a)(v).

No person shall fire any firearm from, upon, along, or across any public road or highway.

No person knowingly shall fire any rifle from the enclosed lands of one person onto or across the enclosed lands of another without the permission of both persons.

No person shall hunt at night upon privately owned or leased lands except with written permission of the landowner or lessee.

History.

Laws 1939, ch. 65, § 48; C.S. 1945, § 47-402; W.S. 1957, § 23-98; Laws 1973, ch. 249, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 23.1-79; Laws 1991, ch. 2, § 1; 2007, ch. 62, § 1; 2017 ch. 116, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

Cross references. —

As to authority to enter land of another to eradicate predatory animals, see §§

11-6-101

through

11-6-103

.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, substituted “low misdemeanor punishable as provided in W.S. 23-6-202(a)(v)” for “7th degree misdemeanor” in (b).

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, in (b), added “collect antlers or horns.”

Quoted

in

Heilig v. Wyo. Game & Fish Comm'n, 2003 WY 27, 64 P.3d 734,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(Wyo. 2003).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Entry on private lands in pursuit of wounded game as criminal trespass, 41 ALR4th 805.

§ 23-3-306.
Use of aircraft, automobiles, motorized and snow vehicles and artificial light for hunting or fishing prohibited; exceptions; penalties.

No person shall harass, pursue, hunt, shoot, or kill any Wyoming wildlife except predatory animals with, from, or by use of any aircraft, automotive vehicle, trailer, motor-propelled wheeled vehicle, or vehicle designed for travel over snow. No person shall use any aircraft, to aid in the taking of any Wyoming wildlife, except predatory animals, whether by spotting or locating the wildlife, communicating with any person attempting to take the wildlife, or by providing other aid to any person taking the wildlife. Nothing in this subsection shall apply to the use of any aircraft by governmental agencies, their employees, contractors or designees performing any lawful duties. The commission may exempt handicapped hunters from any provision of this subsection.

No person shall take any wildlife with the aid of or by using any artificial light or lighting device except as otherwise provided in subsections (f) and (g) of this section and except that predators may be taken with the aid of an artificial light or lighting device by:

A public officer authorized to and conducting predator control;

A landowner, resident manager, or person with the landowner’s or a resident manager’s written permission to take predators, on land under the landowner’s control for the protection of his property.

It is prima facie evidence of a violation of subsection (b) of this section if a person uses an artificial light in an area which may be inhabited by wildlife while having in his possession and control any device for taking wildlife.

Nothing in this section shall prohibit the hunting on foot of raccoon with the aid of a handlight provided the hunter is accompanied by a raccoon hunting dog and if hunting on private lands, has the written permission of the landowner or his agent.

Violation of this section constitutes a high misdemeanor punishable as provided in W.S. 23-6-202(a)(ii).

The commission shall establish by rule and regulation specifications for the taking of game animals with the use of artificial light or lighting devices by persons with central visual acuity disabilities.

The commission shall establish by rule and regulation specifications for the taking of fish with the use of artificial light or lighting devices.

History.

Laws 1939, ch. 65, § 78; C.S. 1945, § 47-516; W.S. 1957, § 23-97; Laws 1967, ch. 9, § 1; 1971, ch. 200, § 1; 1973, ch. 249, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 23.1-80; Laws 1981, ch. 174, § 1; 2003, ch. 107, § 1; 2007, ch. 62, § 1; 2013 ch. 54, § 1, effective February 15, 2013; 2014 ch. 38, § 1, effective July 1, 2014.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, substituted “high misdemeanor punishable as provided in W.S. 23-6-202(a)(ii)” for “4th degree misdemeanor” in (e).

The 2013 amendment,

added in the introductory paragraph in (b) “except as otherwise provided in subsection (f) of this section and” following “lighting device”; in (b)(i) added “and conducting predator” following “authorized to”, and deleted “predators” following “control”; in (b)(ii) added “to take predators” following “written permission”; and added (f).

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, in the introductory paragraph of (b), substituted “in subsections (f) and (g)” for “in subsection (f),” and added (g).

§ 23-3-307.
Hunting while intoxicated or under influence of controlled substance prohibited.

No person shall carry a firearm with a cartridge therein, or take any wildlife in Wyoming, while intoxicated or under the influence of controlled substance as defined in the Wyoming Controlled Substances Act of 1971 [§§

35-7-1001

through

35-7-1057

] or amendments thereto.

Violation of this section constitutes a low misdemeanor punishable as provided in W.S. 23-6-202(a)(v).

History.

Laws 1951, ch. 55, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 23-103; Laws 1973, ch. 249, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 23.1-81; 2007, ch. 62, § 1.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, substituted “low misdemeanor punishable as provided in
W.S. 23-6-202(a)(v)” for “10th degree misdemeanor” in (b).

§ 23-3-308.
Check stations; duty of hunters and fishermen to report.

Every hunter or fisherman entering or leaving areas for which check stations have been established shall stop and report at the check station if the check station is on the hunter’s or fisherman’s route to and from the hunting or fishing area.

Game or fish licensees must produce their licenses and any game animals, game birds, fish, or furbearing animals in their possession for inspection upon request of any authorized department representative.

Check stations shall be manned by department personnel in uniform including insignia and badge.

Violation of this section constitutes a low misdemeanor punishable as provided in W.S. 23-6-202(a)(v).

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 186, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 23-1085; Laws 1973, ch. 249, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 23.1-82; 2007, ch. 62, § 1.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, substituted “a low misdemeanor punishable as provided in W.S. 23-6-202(a)(v)” for “an 11th degree misdemeanor” in (d).

§ 23-3-309.
Intentional feeding of elk; penalty.

No person shall intentionally attract or feed any elk by depositing, placing, distributing or scattering feed that results in commingling with livestock.

Nothing in this section shall prohibit:

Any normal or accepted agricultural management practice;

Any elk feeding program authorized or conducted by the department;

Any legal form of baiting elk as authorized by commission rule and regulation;

Any feeding of elk for the purpose of reducing the opportunity for contact with livestock when undertaken with prior notice to the department;

Any feeding of elk outside a brucellosis surveillance area designated pursuant to Wyoming livestock board rules and regulations.

A first violation of this section constitutes a low misdemeanor punishable as provided in W.S. 23-6-202(a)(v). A second or subsequent violation of this section constitutes a high misdemeanor punishable as provided in W.S. 23-6-202(a)(ii).

History.

Laws 2009, ch. 11, § 1.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2009, ch. 11, § 1, makes the act effective July 1, 2009.

§ 23-3-310.
Possession of road killed wildlife.

The commission shall, in consultation with the state transportation commission, adopt rules to establish a program whereby any person desiring to possess wildlife killed as a result of unintentional motor vehicle collisions on any public road or highway in the state of Wyoming is permitted to do so, provided that he collects the entire road killed animal, both edible and inedible portions and possesses a donation certificate or Wyoming interstate game tag issued by the department, including a certificate or tag issued electronically. Unless otherwise provided by rule of the commission, a person desiring to possess a road killed animal shall contact the department before taking possession of an animal to obtain a donation certificate. The rules may provide that a person requesting the donation certificate may have to present the animal for inspection to verify its possession meets the criteria of the regulation. No person possessing a donation certificate shall donate a road killed animal to a nonprofit organization in accordance with W.S. 35-7-1302(b)(vii).

None of the provisions of this section shall apply to bighorn sheep, gray wolves within any area of the state where gray wolves are classified as trophy game animals, grizzly bears, mountain goats, wildlife species covered under the federal Migratory Bird Treaty Act, federal threatened or endangered species or those species whose possession is prohibited by federal or state statute or regulation.

Nothing in this section shall authorize the taking of wildlife or possession of any illegally taken wildlife.

Upon request of the state transportation commission, the commission shall exempt segments of public road or highway from the program established pursuant to this section.

Once a carcass is retrieved by the department of transportation, it becomes the property of the department and shall be disposed of in accordance with department procedures.

History.

2021 ch. 88, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

Effective date. —

Laws 2021, ch. 88, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2021.